District of Columbia statutes.
26-131.12

Penalties.

If the Commissioner finds, after notice and a hearing, that a person has violated this chapter or a rule or regulation promulgated, or order issued, under this chapter, the Commissioner may order the person to pay to the Department a civil penalty in such amount as the Commissioner determines is appropriate; provided, that the amount of the penalty shall not exceed $1,000 for a violation; provided further, that if there is a continuing violation, the penalty may be no more than the greater of $1,000 or $100 multiplied by the number of days that the violation has continued.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 512, 48 DCR 3244